Louisiana, session 2026, HB260.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 42:1102(20)(b)(iv) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1102. Definitions
Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the following words and
terms, when used in this Chapter, shall have the following meanings:
* * *
(20)
* * *
(b) "Reasonable transportation", with reference to legislators only, means
transportation:
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 260 ENROLLED
(iv) Organized primarily for trade, cultural, diplomatic, educational, or
humanitarian purposes to a foreign country if sponsored by the government of the
foreign country or a civic, nonprofit, educational, or political organization. However,
a legislator shall not accept reasonable transportation sponsored by a government or
non-government person identified as a foreign adversary in 15 CFR 791.4.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.